el: Συμβατότητα αρένας/σταδίου σβούρας μάχης: Beystadium (γενικό); Στάδιο Burst; Μίνι/φορητό στάδιο; Τυπικό στάδιο; Στάδιο Xtreme (Beyblade X); Άλλο
nb: Kompatibilitet mellom arenaer/stadioner på toppnivå: Beystadium (generisk); Burst-stadion; Bærbart stadion / ministadion; Standard stadion; Xtreme-stadion (Beyblade X); Annet
ko: 배틀탑 아레나/스타디움 호환성: 베이스태디움(일반); 버스트 스타디움; 미니/휴대용 스타디움; 표준 스타디움; 익스트림 스타디움(베이블레이드 X); 기타
zh-CN: 战斗陀螺/魔幻陀螺竞技场/体育场兼容性: 陀螺盘（通用）; Burst 陀螺盘; 迷你/便携陀螺盘; 标准陀螺盘; 极限陀螺盘 (Beyblade X); 其他
ru: Совместимость с ареной/стадионом для Battle Top: Бейстадион (обычный); Бейстадион Burst; Мини-арена / портативная арена; Стандартная арена; Xtreme арена (Beyblade X); Другая
fr: Compatibilité avec les arènes ou stades de toupie de combat: Beystadium (générique); Stadium Burst; Stadium mini/portable; Stadium standard; Stadium Xtreme (Beyblade X); Autre
fi: Taisteluhyrrän areenan/stadionin yhteensopivuus: Beystadium (yleinen); Burst-areena; Mini-/kannettava areena; Vakioareena; Xtreme-areena (Beyblade X); Muu
sv: Kompatibilitet med arena/stadion för battle tops: Beystadium (generisk); Burst-stadium; Mini/bärbart stadium; Standardstadium; Xtreme-stadium (Beyblade X); Övrigt
lt-LT: Kovinių suktukų arenos / stadiono suderinamumas: „Beystadium“ (bendrinis); „Burst“ arena; Mini / nešiojama arena; Standartinė arena; „Xtreme“ arena („Beyblade X“); Kita
ro-RO: Compatibilitate cu arenă/stadion de top pentru luptă: Beystadium (generic); Stadion Burst; Stadion mini/portabil; Stadion standard; Stadion Xtreme (Beyblade X); Altele
es: Compatibilidad con arena o estadio del trompo de batalla: Beystadium (genérico); Estadio Burst; Estadio mini/portátil; Estadio estándar; Estadio Xtreme (Beyblade X); Otro
sk-SK: Kompatibilita detských spinerov s arénou/štadiónom: Beystadium (všeobecné); Štadión Burst; Mini/prenosný štadión; Štandardný štadión; Štadión Xtreme (Beyblade X); Iné
ja: バトルトップアリーナ／スタジアム対応: ベイスタジアム (汎用); バーストスタジアム; ミニ/ポータブルスタジアム; スタンダードスタジアム; エクストリームスタジアム (Beyblade X); その他
bg-BG: Съвместимост на въртящите се пумпали с арена/стадион система: Бейстадион (общ); Стадион Burst; Мини/преносим стадион; Стандартен стадион; Стадион Xtreme (Beyblade X); Друго
cs: Kompatibilita s arénou/stadionem pro bojové káči: Beystadium (obecné); Stadion Burst; Mini/přenosný stadion; Standardní stadion; Stadion Xtreme (Beyblade X); Jiné
en: Battle top arena/stadium compatibility: Beystadium (generic); Burst stadium; Mini/portable stadium; Standard stadium; Xtreme stadium (Beyblade X); Other
it: Compatibilità tra arena e stadio di Battle Top: Beystadium (generico); Stadio Burst; Stadio mini/portatile; Stadio standard; Stadio Xtreme (Beyblade X); Altro
pl: Kompatybilność z areną/stadionem battle top: Beystadium (standardowe); Stadion Burst; Minidstadion/przenośny stadion; Standardowy stadion; Stadion Xtreme (Beyblade X); Inne
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับเวที/สนามแบทเทิลท็อป: Beystadium (ทั่วไป); สนาม Burst; สนามขนาดเล็ก/พกพา; สนามมาตรฐาน; สนาม Xtreme (Beyblade X); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Compatibilidade com arenas/estádios de pião de batalha: Beystadium (genérico); Estádio Burst; Estádio mini/portátil; Estádio padrão; Estádio Xtreme (Beyblade X); Outros
hu: Pörgettyűk arénával/stadionnal való kompatibilitása: Beystadium (általános); Burst aréna; Mini/hordozható aréna; Normál aréna; Xtreme aréna (Beyblade X); Egyéb
da: Battle top-kompatibilitet til arenaer/stadioner: Beystadium (generisk); Burst-stadium; Mini-/bærbart stadium; Standard-stadium; Xtreme-stadium (Beyblade X); Andet
pt-PT: Compatibilidade com arenas/estádios de batalha de alto nível: Beystadium (genérico); Estádio Burst; Estádio mini/portátil; Estádio padrão; Estádio Xtreme (Beyblade X); Outro
de: Kompatibilität mit Battle-Top-Arenen/-Stadien: Beystadium (generisch); Burst-Stadion; Mini-/Tragbares Stadion; Standard-Stadion; Xtreme-Stadion (Beyblade X); Sonstige
sl-SI: Združljivost z areno/stadionom Battle Top: Beystadium (splošno); Stadion Burst; Mini/prenosni stadion; Standardni stadion; Stadion Xtreme (Beyblade X); Drugo
tr: Dövüş topacı arena/stadyum uyumluluğu: Beystadium (genel); Burst stadyumu; Mini/taşınabilir stadyum; Standart stadyum; Xtreme stadyumu (Beyblade X); Diğer
vi: Khả năng tương thích với sân đấu/sân vận động: Beystadium (chung); Sân thi đấu Burst; Sân thi đấu mini/di động; Sân thi đấu tiêu chuẩn; Sân thi đấu Xtreme (Beyblade X); Khác
zh-TW: 戰鬥陀螺競技場/體育場相容性: 戰鬥盤 (通用); 爆裂世代戰鬥盤; 迷你/便攜式戰鬥盤; 標準戰鬥盤; 極限戰鬥盤 (Beyblade X); 其他
nl: Battle top arena-/stadioncompatibiliteit: Beystadium (algemeen); Burst-stadion; Mini/draagbaar stadion; Standaard stadion; Xtreme-stadion (Beyblade X); Overig
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost s arenom/stadionom za Battle Top: Beystadium (generički); Burst stadion; Mini/prijenosni stadion; Standardni stadion; Xtreme stadion (Beyblade X); Ostalo